public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dithionario_veneto-1.0.0-windows-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
afanar/A
inalberar/A
aldir/A
alteriđar/A
inamidar/A
anelar/A
ansar/A
ardir/A
arenar/A
aromatiđar/A
asénter/A
adatar/A
aŧidar/A
autorar/A
inaxear/A
reavar/A
xbafarar/A
bajar/A
bakanar/A
inbalar/A
balegar/A
inbalonar/A
inbalsamar/A
balukar/A
bandiđar/A
banpar/A
xbarar/A
xbaraŧar/A
bardar/A
barlúxer/A
arbasar/A
inbastardir/A
dexbateđar/A
xbatolar/A
inbaular/A
xbavaŧar/A
xbaxukiar/A
rebekar/A
bendar/A
xberlotar/A
inbestialir/A
inbeverar/A
biankir/A
biasar/A
xbigatar/A
konbinar/A
xbiñar/A
bisar/A
bitar/A
bixigolar/A
inbogar/A
strabóɉer/A
inbokar/A
inbokonar/A
bolsar/A
abonar/A
bonbardar/A
xbonigolar/A
xboroŧar/A
botiđar/A
brakar/A
bramegar/A
abraŧar/A
brigar/A
xbrodolar/A
xbroentar/A
inbrunir/A
bufonar/A
dexbutar/A
cacarar/A
scatar/A
aparcèñer/A
inkoncéñer/A
cibar/A
scokiđar/A
dir/A
predir/A
dedegar/A
xderenar/A
diamantar/A
maledíxer/A
doloxar/A
doparar/A
dormikiar/A
redreŧar/A
redúxer/A
đogar/A
đovar/A
inedukar/A
subentrar/A
eterniđar/A
exortar/A
torefar/A
infaldar/A
fameliariđar/A
fasar/A
favelar/A
onfegar/A
infemenir/A
desferar/A
festeđar/A
fiakar/A
fiaskeđar/A
figurar/A
filtrar/A
infiorar/A
fiskar/A
influenŧar/A
fojar/A
refónder/A
desformar/A
forteđar/A
frakar/A
infrapolar/A
sfraŧar/A
refreskar/A
frodar/A
refudar/A
fumegar/A
refúxer/A
galeđar/A
inganbarar/A
garbelar/A
xgaruɉar/A
getar/A
ingolfar/A
xgorgeđar/A
gramolar/A
ingranfir/A
ringraŧiar/A
ingremir/A
grintar/A
ingrixolir/A
ingrumar/A
xgualivar/A
xguinŧar/A
idratar/A
dixinestar/A
inpiokar/A
reintegrar/A
inxavaskar/A
joŧar/A
ɉelomarar/A
xɉoŧar/A
inkadenar/A
kalar/A
kalkarar/A
kalŧinar/A
inkanalar/A
inkankarir/A
kantarar/A
kapeɉar/A
deskapujar/A
kargar/A
skaroŧar/A
inskartoŧar/A
kastronar/A
inkatigar/A
kauŧionar/A
inkaveŧar/A
konklúder/A
skojonar/A
skolar/A
inkoltrinar/A
skonir/A
inkonkar/A
konóser/A
kontrir/A
koñóser/A
strakórer/A
skòrđer/A
korsiđar/A
skotolar/A
koxinar/A
krexemar/A
deskrosar/A
krupoliđar/A
kucar/A
skufonar/A
kulatar/A
kurioxar/A
lagar/A
lañar/A
laskar/A
inlear/A
xlénđer/A
relevar/A
xlièđer/A
interlinear/A
sublokar/A
xlontanar/A
lumar/A
xluxegar/A
xmagrar/A
permaner/A
manganar/A
xmañaŧar/A
maridar/A
masakrar/A
matar/A
maŧipar/A
inframeđar/A
remenar/A
meravejar/A
desprométer/A
traméter/A
ministrar/A
mixurar/A
amolir/A
mónđer/A
moraliđar/A
moroxar/A
motar/A
mucegarar/A
dexmunegar/A
mutegar/A
xnaređar/A
negar/A
nikar/A
dexnonbolar/A
nuvolar/A
dexobedir/A
inokar/A
ondar/A
abòrer/A
orixenar/A
ostinar/A
pair/A
inpaɉetar/A
inpalidir/A
apanar/A
spanŧar/A
preparar/A
inparonir/A
pasir/A
pasteđar/A
espatriar/A
spaveɉar/A
strapegar/A
inpelukar/A
pénđer/A
konpensar/A
despèrder/A
pertegar/A
peteđar/A
inpeŧar/A
inpiantar/A
pieđar/A
pilar/A
piotar/A
pisolar/A
inpiŧolar/A
inpocar/A
polveriđar/A
kontrapóner/A
ponpar/A
spontiđar/A
konportar/A
inpostar/A
povolar/A
sopresar/A
priar/A
spropiar/A
inpuñar/A
puŧar/A
rafar/A
rancinar/A
ranŧiñar/A
rauŧir/A
regolar/A
reŧitar/A
rikir/A
derobar/A
rokir/A
ronkeđar/A
rostelar/A
rufar/A
ruŧar/A
konsagrar/A
strasalir/A
saltinar/A
insaorir/A
saxar/A
scordir/A
sekurar/A
susèguer/A
selar/A
insenpiar/A
reaseñar/A
reservar/A
sfraselar/A
desiɉilar/A
sioperar/A
skalar/A
skarpiar/A
inskaturir/A
skiumar/A
skreŧolar/A
skuarŧar/A
desolar/A
resòlver/A
sorar/A
soverkiar/A
ispaxemar/A
speronar/A
spiferar/A
spiritar/A
spoxar/A
movestar/A
starnir/A
staŧionar/A
istigar/A
instituir/A
stomegar/A
strangolar/A
instrigar/A
strukolar/A
studiar/A
sucéder/A
supar/A
insutilir/A
retaɉar/A
destanar/A
tapinar/A
intarsiar/A
intavelar/A
enténder/A
tenperar/A
sostentar/A
oteñir/A
tratèñer/A
terir/A
testar/A
tindonar/A
intixikir/A
tonbolar/A
intorbidir/A
intortiɉar/A
tràer/A
tràder/A
trapar/A
traŧar/A
stremir/A
trigar/A
tronbiđar/A
truŧidar/A
deŧakolar/A
proŧéder/A
konŧeñar/A
skonŧertar/A
ŧiganar/A
manŧipar/A
ŧopegar/A
inumidir/A
uxmar/A
invalidar/A
xvanŧar/A
devedar/A
veɉar/A
xvénder/A
aveñir/A
vèñer/A
soravèñer/A
verigolar/A
pervertir/A
travestir/A
vidimar/A
violar/A
vivatar/A
revokar/A
voltolar/A
devorar/A
exaudir/A
xbuandar/A
suxerir/A
xlainar/A
xñinfeđar/A
xustiŧiar/A
